Illinois, session 104th, HB5787.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 112A-22 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/112A-22)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-22)7    Sec. 112A-22. Notice of orders. 8    (a) Entry and issuance. Upon issuance of any protective 9order, the clerk shall immediately, or on the next court day if 10an ex parte order is issued under subsection (e) of Section 11112A-17.5 of this Code, (i) enter the order on the record and 12file it in accordance with the circuit court procedures and 13(ii) provide a file stamped copy of the order to respondent and 14to petitioner, if present, and to the State's Attorney. If the 15victim is not present the State's Attorney shall (i) as soon as 16practicable notify the petitioner the order has been entered 17and (ii) provide a file stamped copy of the order to the 18petitioner within 3 days. 19    (b) Filing with sheriff. The clerk of the issuing judge 20shall, on the same day that a protective order is issued, file 21a copy of that order with the sheriff or other law enforcement 22officials charged with maintaining Illinois State Police 23records or charged with serving the order upon respondent. If   HB5787- 2 -LRB104 21928 RLC 37834 b1the order was issued under subsection (e) of Section 112A-17.5 2of this Code, the clerk on the next court day shall file a 3certified copy of the order with the sheriff or other law 4enforcement officials charged with maintaining Illinois State 5Police records. 6    (c) (Blank).7    (c-1) Service at hearing. Notice and service of a 8protective order shall be deemed to have been made upon a 9respondent if the respondent was personally present in open 10court at the time the presiding judge issued the protective 11order, even if the respondent did not remain personally 12present for the duration of the court hearing to hear all of 13the conditions set by the presiding judge under the protective 14order. 15    (c-2) Service by sheriff. Unless respondent was present in 16court when the order was issued, the sheriff, other law 17enforcement official, or special process server shall promptly 18serve that order upon respondent and file proof of the 19service, in the manner provided for service of process in 20civil proceedings. Instead of serving the order upon the 21respondent; however, the sheriff, other law enforcement 22official, special process server, or other persons defined in 23Section 112A-22.1 of this Code may serve the respondent with a 24short form notification as provided in Section 112A-22.1 of 25this Code. If process has not yet been served upon the 26respondent, process shall be served with the order or short   HB5787- 3 -LRB104 21928 RLC 37834 b1form notification if the service is made by the sheriff, other 2law enforcement official, or special process server.3    (c-3) If the person against whom the protective order is 4issued is arrested and the written order is issued under 5subsection (e) of Section 112A-17.5 of this Code and received 6by the custodial law enforcement agency before the respondent 7or arrestee is released from custody, the custodial law 8enforcement agency shall promptly serve the order upon the 9respondent or arrestee before the respondent or arrestee is 10released from custody. In no event shall detention of the 11respondent or arrestee be extended for a hearing on the 12petition for protective order or receipt of the order issued 13under Section 112A-17 of this Code.14    (c-4) Extensions, modifications, and revocations. Any 15order extending, modifying, or revoking any protective order 16shall be promptly recorded, issued, and served as provided in 17this Section. 18    (c-5) (Blank).19    (d) (Blank).20    (e) Notice to health care facilities and health care 21practitioners. Upon the request of the petitioner, the clerk 22of the circuit court shall send a certified copy of the 23protective order to any specified health care facility or 24health care practitioner requested by the petitioner at the 25mailing address provided by the petitioner.26    (f) Disclosure by health care facilities and health care   HB5787- 4 -LRB104 21928 RLC 37834 b1practitioners. After receiving a certified copy of a 2protective order that prohibits a respondent's access to 3records, no health care facility or health care practitioner 4shall allow a respondent access to the records of any child who 5is a protected person under the protective order, or release 6information in those records to the respondent, unless the 7order has expired or the respondent shows a certified copy of 8the court order vacating the corresponding protective order 9that was sent to the health care facility or practitioner. 10Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require health 11care facilities or health care practitioners to alter 12procedures related to billing and payment. The health care 13facility or health care practitioner may file the copy of the 14protective order in the records of a child who is a protected 15person under the protective order, or may employ any other 16method to identify the records to which a respondent is 17prohibited access. No health care facility or health care 18practitioner shall be civilly or professionally liable for 19reliance on a copy of a protective order, except for willful 20and wanton misconduct. 21    (g) Notice to schools. Upon the request of the petitioner, 22within 24 hours of the issuance of a protective order, the 23clerk of the issuing judge shall send a certified copy of the 24protective order to the day-care facility, pre-school or 25pre-kindergarten, or private school or the principal office of 26the public school district or any college or university in   HB5787- 5 -LRB104 21928 RLC 37834 b1which any child who is a protected person under the protective 2order or any child of the petitioner is enrolled as requested 3by the petitioner at the mailing address provided by the 4petitioner. If the child transfers enrollment to another 5day-care facility, pre-school, pre-kindergarten, private 6school, public school, college, or university, the petitioner 7may, within 24 hours of the transfer, send to the clerk written 8notice of the transfer, including the name and address of the 9institution to which the child is transferring. Within 24 10hours of receipt of notice from the petitioner that a child is 11transferring to another day-care facility, pre-school, 12pre-kindergarten, private school, public school, college, or 13university, the clerk shall send a certified copy of the order 14to the institution to which the child is transferring.15    (h) Disclosure by schools. After receiving a certified 16copy of a protective order that prohibits a respondent's 17access to records, neither a day-care facility, pre-school, 18pre-kindergarten, public or private school, college, or 19university nor its employees shall allow a respondent access 20to a protected child's records or release information in those 21records to the respondent. The school shall file the copy of 22the protective order in the records of a child who is a 23protected person under the order. When a child who is a 24protected person under the protective order transfers to 25another day-care facility, pre-school, pre-kindergarten, 26public or private school, college, or university, the   HB5787- 6 -LRB104 21928 RLC 37834 b1institution from which the child is transferring may, at the 2request of the petitioner, provide, within 24 hours of the 3transfer, written notice of the protective order, along with a 4certified copy of the order, to the institution to which the 5child is transferring.6(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    Section 10. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 8amended by changing Section 222 as follows: 9    (750 ILCS 60/222)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-22)10    Sec. 222. Notice of orders. 11    (a) Entry and issuance. Upon issuance of any order of 12protection, the clerk shall immediately (i) enter the order on 13the record and file it in accordance with the circuit court 14procedures and (ii) provide a file stamped copy of the order to 15respondent, if present, and to petitioner.16    (b) Filing with sheriff or other law enforcement 17officials. The clerk of the issuing judge shall, or the 18petitioner may, on the same day that an order of protection is 19issued, file a certified copy of that order with the sheriff or 20other law enforcement officials charged with maintaining 21Illinois State Police records or charged with serving the 22order upon respondent or executing any search warrant issued 23under paragraph (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of 24this Act. If a search warrant is issued under paragraph (14.5)   HB5787- 7 -LRB104 21928 RLC 37834 b1of subsection (b) of Section 214 of this Act, the clerk of the 2issuing judge shall, or the petitioner may, on the same day 3that the warrant is issued, transmit the warrant to the law 4enforcement agency to which the warrant is directed. If the 5respondent, at the time of the issuance of the order, is 6committed to the custody of the Illinois Department of 7Corrections or Illinois Department of Juvenile Justice or is 8on parole, aftercare release, or mandatory supervised release, 9the sheriff or other law enforcement officials charged with 10maintaining Illinois State Police records shall notify the 11Department of Corrections or Department of Juvenile Justice 12within 48 hours of receipt of a copy of the order of protection 13from the clerk of the issuing judge or the petitioner. Such 14notice shall include the name of the respondent, the 15respondent's IDOC inmate number or IDJJ youth identification 16number, the respondent's date of birth, and the LEADS Record 17Index Number.18    (c) Service by sheriff. Unless respondent was present in 19court when the order was issued, the sheriff, other law 20enforcement official or special process server shall promptly 21serve that order upon respondent and file proof of such 22service, in the manner provided for service of process in 23civil proceedings. Instead of serving the order upon the 24respondent, however, the sheriff, other law enforcement 25official, special process server, or other persons defined in 26Section 222.10 may serve the respondent with a short form   HB5787- 8 -LRB104 21928 RLC 37834 b1notification as provided in Section 222.10. If process has not 2yet been served upon the respondent, it shall be served with 3the order or short form notification if such service is made by 4the sheriff, other law enforcement official, or special 5process server. A single fee may be charged for service of an 6order obtained in civil court, or for service of such an order 7together with process, unless waived or deferred under Section 8210.9    (c-1) Notice and service of an order of protection shall 10be deemed to have been made upon a respondent if the respondent 11was personally present in open court at the time the presiding 12judge issued the order of protection, even if the respondent 13did not remain personally present for the duration of the 14court hearing to hear all of the conditions set by the 15presiding judge under the order of protection. 16    (c-5) If the person against whom the order of protection 17is issued is arrested and the written order is issued in 18accordance with subsection (c) of Section 217 and received by 19the custodial law enforcement agency before the respondent or 20arrestee is released from custody, the custodial law 21enforcement agent shall promptly serve the order upon the 22respondent or arrestee before the respondent or arrestee is 23released from custody. In no event shall detention of the 24respondent or arrestee be extended for hearing on the petition 25for order of protection or receipt of the order issued under 26Section 217 of this Act.  HB5787- 9 -LRB104 21928 RLC 37834 b1    (d) Extensions, modifications and revocations. Any order 2extending, modifying or revoking any order of protection shall 3be promptly recorded, issued and served as provided in this 4Section.5    (e) Notice to schools. Upon the request of the petitioner, 6within 24 hours of the issuance of an order of protection, the 7clerk of the issuing judge shall send a certified copy of the 8order of protection to the day-care facility, pre-school or 9pre-kindergarten, or private school or the principal office of 10the public school district or any college or university in 11which any child who is a protected person under the order of 12protection or any child of the petitioner is enrolled as 13requested by the petitioner at the mailing address provided by 14the petitioner. If the child transfers enrollment to another 15day-care facility, pre-school, pre-kindergarten, private 16school, public school, college, or university, the petitioner 17may, within 24 hours of the transfer, send to the clerk written 18notice of the transfer, including the name and address of the 19institution to which the child is transferring. Within 24 20hours of receipt of notice from the petitioner that a child is 21transferring to another day-care facility, pre-school, 22pre-kindergarten, private school, public school, college, or 23university, the clerk shall send a certified copy of the order 24to the institution to which the child is transferring.25    (f) Disclosure by schools. After receiving a certified 26copy of an order of protection that prohibits a respondent's   HB5787- 10 -LRB104 21928 RLC 37834 b1access to records, neither a day-care facility, pre-school, 2pre-kindergarten, public or private school, college, or 3university nor its employees shall allow a respondent access 4to a protected child's records or release information in those 5records to the respondent. The school shall file the copy of 6the order of protection in the records of a child who is a 7protected person under the order of protection. When a child 8who is a protected person under the order of protection 9transfers to another day-care facility, pre-school, 10pre-kindergarten, public or private school, college, or 11university, the institution from which the child is 12transferring may, at the request of the petitioner, provide, 13within 24 hours of the transfer, written notice of the order of 14protection, along with a certified copy of the order, to the 15institution to which the child is transferring.16    (g) Notice to health care facilities and health care 17practitioners. Upon the request of the petitioner, the clerk 18of the circuit court shall send a certified copy of the order 19of protection to any specified health care facility or health 20care practitioner requested by the petitioner at the mailing 21address provided by the petitioner. 22    (h) Disclosure by health care facilities and health care 23practitioners. After receiving a certified copy of an order of 24protection that prohibits a respondent's access to records, no 25health care facility or health care practitioner shall allow a 26respondent access to the records of any child who is a   HB5787- 11 -LRB104 21928 RLC 37834 b1protected person under the order of protection, or release 2information in those records to the respondent, unless the 3order has expired or the respondent shows a certified copy of 4the court order vacating the corresponding order of protection 5that was sent to the health care facility or practitioner. 6Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require health 7care facilities or health care practitioners to alter 8procedures related to billing and payment. The health care 9facility or health care practitioner may file the copy of the 10order of protection in the records of a child who is a 11protected person under the order of protection, or may employ 12any other method to identify the records to which a respondent 13is prohibited access. No health care facility or health care 14practitioner shall be civilly or professionally liable for 15reliance on a copy of an order of protection, except for 16willful and wanton misconduct. 17(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-1065, eff. 5-11-25.)